Utah statutes.
73-15-4.   Water from cloud seeding part of natural water supply -- Notice of intent prior to cloud-seeding project.

All water derived as a result of cloud seeding shall be considered a part of the natural water supply of the basin in the same sense as if no cloud seeding operations had been conducted, and any water so derived shall not be subject to new appropriations but shall be administered and distributed to users on the stream system in accordance with existing water rights. A notice of intent shall be filed with the Division of Water Rights prior to the commencement of a cloud-seeding project.

